Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF664.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.056, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Income. (a) To be eligible for medical assistance, a person eligible under section 256B.055, subdivisions 7, 7a, and 12, may have income up to deleted text begin 100deleted text end new text begin 133new text end percent of the federal poverty guidelines. Effective January 1, 2000, and each successive January, recipients of Supplemental Security Income may have an income up to the Supplemental Security Income standard in effect on that date. (b) To be eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 3a, a parent or caretaker relative may have an income up to 133 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the household size. (c) To be eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 15, a person may have an income up to 133 percent of federal poverty guidelines for the household size. (d) To be eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 16, a child age 19 to 20 may have an income up to 133 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the household size. (e) To be eligible for medical assistance under section 256B.055, subdivision 3a, a child under age 19 may have income up to 275 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the household size. (f) In computing income to determine eligibility of persons under paragraphs (a) to (e) who are not residents of long-term care facilities, the commissioner shall disregard increases in income as required by Public Laws 94-566, section 503; 99-272; and 99-509. For persons eligible under paragraph (a), veteran aid and attendance benefits and Veterans Administration unusual medical expense payments are considered income to the recipient. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end